Tables/Contraction/th.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2026 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - Thai (contracted)
#
# Samuel Thibault <samuel.thibault@ens-lyon.org>
# 
# This table is based on the Unesco report on the progress of unification of
# braille writing « L'ÉCRITURE BRAILLE DANS LE MONDE », by Sir Clutha
# MACKENZIE: http://unesdoc.unesco.org/images/0013/001352/135251fo.pdf
# The document is dated 1954, so this table may be quite outdated.

# consonants
always ก 1245	  	THAI CHARACTER KO KAI
always ข 346		THAI CHARACTER KHO KHAI
always ฃ 2346		THAI CHARACTER KHO KHUAT
always ค 136	  	THAI CHARACTER KHO KHWAI
always ฅ 6-136	  	THAI CHARACTER KHO KHON
always ฆ 36-136	  	THAI CHARACTER KHO RAKHANG
always ง 12456	  	THAI CHARACTER NGO NGU
always จ 245	  	THAI CHARACTER CHO CHAN
always ฉ 34	  	THAI CHARACTER CHO CHING
always ช 13	  	THAI CHARACTER CHO CHANG
always ซ 36-13	  	THAI CHARACTER SO SO
always ฌ 6-346	  	THAI CHARACTER CHO CHOE
always ญ 6-13456  	THAI CHARACTER YO YING
always ฎ 6-145	  	THAI CHARACTER DO CHADA
always ฏ 6-1256  	THAI CHARACTER TO PATAK
always ฐ 6-2345	  	THAI CHARACTER THO THAN
always ฑ 6-23456  	THAI CHARACTER THO NANGMONTHO
always ฒ 56-23456	THAI CHARACTER THO PHUTHAO
always ณ 6-1345	  	THAI CHARACTER NO NEN
always ด 145	  	THAI CHARACTER DO DEK
always ต 1256	  	THAI CHARACTER TO TAO
always ถ 2345	  	THAI CHARACTER THO THUNG
always ท 23456	  	THAI CHARACTER THO THAHAN
always ธ 356-23456	THAI CHARACTER THO THONG
always น 1345	  	THAI CHARACTER NO NU
always บ 1236	  	THAI CHARACTER BO BAIMAI
always ป 12346	  	THAI CHARACTER PO PLA
always ผ 1234	  	THAI CHARACTER PHO PHUNG
always ฝ 1346	  	THAI CHARACTER FO FA
always พ 1456	  	THAI CHARACTER PHO PHAN
always ฟ 1246	  	THAI CHARACTER FO FAN
always ภ 6-1456	  	THAI CHARACTER PHO SAMPHAO
always ม 134	  	THAI CHARACTER MO MA
always ย 13456	  	THAI CHARACTER YO YAK
always ร 1235	  	THAI CHARACTER RO RUA
always ล 123	  	THAI CHARACTER LO LING
always ว 2456	  	THAI CHARACTER WO WAEN
always ศ 6-234	  	THAI CHARACTER SO SALA
always ษ 36-234	  	THAI CHARACTER SO RUSI
always ส 234	  	THAI CHARACTER SO SUA
always ห 125	  	THAI CHARACTER HO HIP
always ฬ 36-123	  	THAI CHARACTER LO CHULA
always อ 135	  	THAI CHARACTER O ANG
always ฮ 123456	  	THAI CHARACTER HO NOKHUK

# vowels
always ะ 1	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA A
always า 16	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA AA
always ำ 1356	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA AM
always  ิ 12	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA I
always  ี 23	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA II
always  ึ 246	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA UE
always  ื 26	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA UEE
always  ุ 14	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA U
always  ู 25	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA UU
always เ 124	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA E
always แ 126	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA AE
always โ 24	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA O
always ใ 156-1	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA AI MAIMUAN
always ไ 156	  	THAI CHARACTER SARA AI MAIMALAI

# contractions
always เๅะ 135-1
always ออ 135
always วั 15
always เีย 12356
always เี่อ 12345
always เออ 146
always เา 235

# accents etc
always ๆ 2	  	THAI CHARACTER MAIYAMOK
always  ็ 6	  	THAI CHARACTER MAITAIKHU
always  ่ 35	  	THAI CHARACTER MAI EK
always  ้ 256	  	THAI CHARACTER MAI THO
always  ๊ 2356	  	THAI CHARACTER MAI TRI
always  ๋ 236	  	THAI CHARACTER MAI CHATTAWA
always  ์ 356	  	THAI CHARACTER THANTHAKHAT

# digits
always ๐ 2458	  	THAI DIGIT ZERO
always ๑ 18	  	THAI DIGIT ONE
always ๒ 128	  	THAI DIGIT TWO
always ๓ 148	  	THAI DIGIT THREE
always ๔ 1458	  	THAI DIGIT FOUR
always ๕ 158	  	THAI DIGIT FIVE
always ๖ 1248	  	THAI DIGIT SIX
always ๗ 12458	  	THAI DIGIT SEVEN
always ๘ 1258	  	THAI DIGIT EIGHT
always ๙ 248	  	THAI DIGIT NINE

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
emoji th
